Missouri, session 2026, HB1826.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 167.627, 167.630, 190.246, 196.990, and 321.621, RSMo, are
repealed and five new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 167.627,
167.630, 190.246, 196.990, and 321.621, to read as follows:
167.627. 1. For purposes of this section, the following terms shall mean:
(1) "Epinephrine delivery system", a single-use device or system used for the
delivery of a premeasured dose of epinephrine into the human body;
(2) "Medication", any medicine prescribed or ordered by a physician for the treatment
of asthma or anaphylaxis, including without limitation inhaled bronchodilators and [auto-
injectible] epinephrine delivery systems;
[(2)] (3) "Self-administration", a pupil's discretionary use of medication prescribed by
a physician or under a written treatment plan from a physician.
2. Each board of education and its employees and agents in this state shall grant any
pupil in the school authorization for the possession and self-administration of medication to
treat such pupil's chronic health condition, including but not limited to asthma or anaphylaxis
if:
(1) A licensed physician prescribed or ordered such medication for use by the pupil
and instructed such pupil in the correct and responsible use of such medication;
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HCS HBs 1826, 2560, 2349 & 2194 2
(2) The pupil has demonstrated to the pupil's licensed physician or the licensed
physician's designee, and the school nurse, if available, the skill level necessary to use the
medication and any device or system necessary to administer such medication prescribed or
ordered;
(3) The pupil's physician has approved and signed a written treatment plan for
managing the pupil's chronic health condition, including asthma or anaphylaxis episodes and
for medication for use by the pupil. Such plan shall include a statement that the pupil is
capable of self-administering the medication under the treatment plan;
(4) The pupil's parent or guardian has completed and submitted to the school any
written documentation required by the school, including the treatment plan required under
subdivision (3) of this subsection and the liability statement required under subdivision (5) of
this subsection; and
(5) The pupil's parent or guardian has signed a statement acknowledging that the
school district and its employees or agents shall incur no liability as a result of any injury
arising from the self-administration of medication by the pupil or the administration of such
medication by school staff. Such statement shall not be construed to release the school
district and its employees or agents from liability for negligence.
3. An authorization granted under subsection 2 of this section shall:
(1) Permit such pupil to possess and self-administer such pupil's medication while in
school, at a school-sponsored activity, and in transit to or from school or school-sponsored
activity; and
(2) Be effective only for the same school and school year for which it is granted.
Such authorization shall be renewed by the pupil's parent or guardian each subsequent school
year in accordance with this section.
4. Any current duplicate prescription medication, if provided by a pupil's parent or
guardian or by the school, shall be kept at a pupil's school in a location at which the pupil or
school staff has immediate access in the event of an asthma or anaphylaxis emergency.
5. The information described in subdivisions (3) and (4) of subsection 2 of this
section shall be kept on file at the pupil's school in a location easily accessible in the event of
an emergency.
167.630. 1. As used in this section, the term "epinephrine delivery system" has
the same meaning given to the term in section 167.627.
2. Each school board may authorize a school nurse licensed under chapter 335 who is
employed by the school district and for whom the board is responsible for to maintain an
adequate supply of [prefilled auto syringes of] epinephrine [with fifteen-hundredths milligram
or three-tenths milligram] delivery systems at the school. The nurse shall recommend to the

HCS HBs 1826, 2560, 2349 & 2194 3
school board the number of [prefilled] epinephrine [auto syringes] delivery systems that the
school should maintain.
[2.] 3. To obtain [prefilled] epinephrine [auto syringes] delivery systems for a school
district, a prescription written by a licensed physician, a physician's assistant, or nurse
practitioner is required. For such prescriptions, the school district shall be designated as the
patient, the nurse's name shall be required, and the prescription shall be filled at a licensed
pharmacy.
[3.] 4. A school nurse, contracted agent trained by a nurse, or other school employee
trained by and supervised by the nurse shall have the discretion to use an epinephrine [auto
syringe] delivery system on any student the school nurse, trained employee, or trained
contracted agent believes is having a life-threatening anaphylactic reaction based on the
training in recognizing an acute episode of an anaphylactic reaction. The provisions of
section 167.624 concerning immunity from civil liability for trained employees administering
lifesaving methods shall apply to trained employees administering [a prefilled auto syringe]
an epinephrine delivery system under this section. Trained contracted agents shall have
immunity from civil liability for administering [a prefilled auto syringe] an epinephrine
delivery system under this section.
190.246. 1. As used in this section, the following terms shall mean:
(1) "Eligible person, firm, organization or other entity", an ambulance service or
emergency medical response agency, an emergency medical responder, or an emergency
medical technician who is employed by, or an enrolled member, person, firm, organization or
entity designated by, rule of the department of health and senior services in consultation with
other appropriate agencies. All such eligible persons, firms, organizations or other entities
shall be subject to the rules promulgated by the director of the department of health and senior
services;
(2) "Emergency health care provider":
(a) A physician licensed pursuant to chapter 334 with knowledge and experience in
the delivery of emergency care; or
(b) A hospital licensed pursuant to chapter 197 that provides emergency care;
(3) "Epinephrine delivery system", a single-use device or system used for the
delivery of a premeasured dose of epinephrine into the human body.
2. Possession and use of epinephrine [auto-injector devices] delivery systems shall
be limited as follows:
(1) No person shall use an epinephrine [auto-injector device] delivery system unless
such person has successfully completed a training course in the use of epinephrine [auto-
injector devices] delivery systems approved by the director of the department of health and

HCS HBs 1826, 2560, 2349 & 2194 4
senior services. Nothing in this section shall prohibit the use of an epinephrine [auto-injector
device] delivery system:
(a) By a health care professional licensed or certified by this state who is acting
within the scope of his or her practice; or
(b) By a person acting pursuant to a lawful prescription;
(2) Every person, firm, organization and entity authorized to possess and use
epinephrine [auto-injector devices] delivery systems pursuant to this section shall use,
maintain and dispose of such [devices] systems in accordance with the rules of the
department; and
(3) Every use of an epinephrine [auto-injector device] delivery system pursuant to
this section shall immediately be reported to the emergency health care provider.
3. (1) Use of an epinephrine [auto-injector device] delivery system pursuant to this
section shall be considered first aid or emergency treatment for the purpose of any law
relating to liability.
(2) Purchase, acquisition, possession or use of an epinephrine [auto-injector device]
delivery systempursuant to this section shall not constitute the unlawful practice of medicine
or the unlawful practice of a profession.
(3) Any person otherwise authorized to sell or provide an epinephrine [auto-injector
device] delivery system may sell or provide it to a person authorized to possess it pursuant to
this section.
4. Any person, firm, organization or entity that violates the provisions of this section
is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.
196.990. 1. As used in this section, the following terms shall mean:
(1) "Administer", the direct application of an epinephrine [auto-injector] delivery
system to the body of an individual;
(2) "Authorized entity", any entity or organization at or in connection with which
allergens capable of causing anaphylaxis may be present including, but not limited to,
qualified first responders, as such term is defined in section 321.621, facilities licensed
under chapter 198, restaurants, recreation camps, youth sports leagues, child care facilities,
amusement parks, and sports arenas. "Authorized entity" shall not include any public school
or public charter school;
(3) "Epinephrine [auto-injector] delivery system", a single-use device or system
used for the [automatic injection] delivery of a premeasured dose of epinephrine into the
human body;
(4) "Physician", a physician licensed in this state under chapter 334;
(5) "Provide", the supply of one or more epinephrine [auto-injectors] delivery
systems to an individual;

HCS HBs 1826, 2560, 2349 & 2194 5
(6) "Self-administration", a person's discretionary use of an epinephrine [auto-
injector] delivery system.
2. A physician may prescribe epinephrine [auto-injectors] delivery systems in the
name of an authorized entity for use in accordance with this section, and pharmacists,
physicians, and other persons authorized to dispense prescription medications may dispense
epinephrine [auto-injectors] delivery systems under a prescription issued in the name of an
authorized entity.
3. An authorized entity may acquire and stock a supply of epinephrine [auto-
injectors] delivery systems under a prescription issued in accordance with this section. Such
epinephrine [auto-injectors] delivery systems shall be stored in a location readily accessible
in an emergency and in accordance with the epinephrine [auto-injector's] delivery system's
instructions for use and any additional requirements established by the department of health
and senior services by rule. An authorized entity shall designate employees or agents who
have completed the training required under this section to be responsible for the storage,
maintenance, and general oversight of epinephrine [auto-injectors] delivery systemsacquired
by the authorized entity.
4. An authorized entity that acquires a supply of epinephrine [auto-injectors] delivery
systems under a prescription issued in accordance with this section shall ensure that:
(1) Expected epinephrine [auto-injector] delivery system users receive training in
recognizing symptoms of severe allergic reactions including anaphylaxis and the use of
epinephrine [auto-injectors] delivery systems from a nationally recognized organization
experienced in training laypersons in emergency health treatment or another entity or person
approved by the department of health and senior services;
(2) All epinephrine [auto-injectors] delivery systems are maintained and stored
according to the epinephrine [auto-injector's] delivery system's instructions for use;
(3) Any person who provides or administers an epinephrine [auto-injector] delivery
system to an individual who the person believes in good faith is experiencing anaphylaxis
activates the emergency medical services system as soon as possible; and
(4) A proper review of all situations in which an epinephrine [auto-injector] delivery
system is used to render emergency care is conducted.
5. Any authorized entity that acquires a supply of epinephrine [auto-injectors]
delivery systems under a prescription issued in accordance with this section shall notify the
emergency communications district or the ambulance dispatch center of the primary provider
of emergency medical services where the epinephrine [auto-injectors] delivery systemsare to
be located within the entity's facility.
6. No person shall provide or administer an epinephrine [auto-injector] delivery
system to any individual who is under eighteen years of age without the verbal consent of a

HCS HBs 1826, 2560, 2349 & 2194 6
parent or guardian who is present at the time when provision or administration of the
epinephrine [auto-injector] delivery system is needed. Provided, however, that a person may
provide or administer an epinephrine [auto-injector] delivery system to such an individual
without the consent of a parent or guardian if the parent or guardian is not physically present
and the person reasonably believes the individual shall be in imminent danger without the
provision or administration of the epinephrine [auto-injector] delivery system.
7. The following persons and entities shall not be liable for any injuries or related
damages that result from the administration or self-administration of an epinephrine [auto-
injector] delivery system in accordance with this section that may constitute ordinary
negligence:
(1) An authorized entity that possesses and makes available epinephrine [auto-
injectors] delivery systems and its employees, agents, and other trained persons;
(2) Any person who uses an epinephrine [auto-injector] delivery system made
available under this section;
(3) A physician that prescribes epinephrine [auto-injectors] delivery systems to an
authorized entity; or
(4) Any person or entity that conducts the training described in this section.

Such immunity does not apply to acts or omissions constituting a reckless disregard for the
safety of others or willful or wanton conduct. The administration of an epinephrine [auto-
injector] delivery system in accordance with this section shall not be considered the practice
of medicine. The immunity from liability provided under this subsection is in addition to and
not in lieu of that provided under section 537.037. An authorized entity located in this state
shall not be liable for any injuries or related damages that result from the provision or
administration of an epinephrine [auto-injector] delivery system by its employees or agents
outside of this state if the entity or its employee or agent is not liable for such injuries or
related damages under the laws of the state in which such provision or administration
occurred. No trained person who is in compliance with this section and who in good faith and
exercising reasonable care fails to administer an epinephrine [auto-injector] delivery system
shall be liable for such failure.
8. All basic life support ambulances and stretcher vans operated in the state shall be
equipped with epinephrine [auto-injectors] delivery systems and be staffed by at least one
individual trained in the use of epinephrine [auto-injectors] delivery systems.
9. The provisions of this section shall apply in all counties within the state and any
city not within a county.
10. Nothing in this section shall be construed as superseding the provisions of section
167.630.

HCS HBs 1826, 2560, 2349 & 2194 7
321.621. 1. For the purposes of this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Epinephrine delivery system", a single-use device or system used for the
delivery of a premeasured dose of epinephrine into the human body;
(2) "Qualified first responder" [shall mean], any state and local law enforcement
agency staff, fire department personnel, fire district personnel, or licensed emergency medical
technician who is acting under the directives and established protocols of a medical director
who comes in contact with a person suffering from an anaphylactic reaction and who has
received training in recognizing and responding to anaphylactic reactions and the
administration of epinephrine [auto-injector devices] delivery systems to a person
suffering from an apparent anaphylactic reaction[.];
(3) "Qualified first responder agencies" [shall mean], any state or local law
enforcement agency, fire department, or ambulance service that provides documented training
to its staff related to the administration of epinephrine [auto-injector devices] delivery
systems in an apparent anaphylactic reaction.
2. The director of the department of health and senior services, if a licensed
physician, may issue a statewide standing order for epinephrine [auto-injector devices]
delivery systems for adult patients to fire protection districts in nonmetropolitan areas in
Missouri as such areas are determined according to the United States Census Bureau's
American Community Survey, based on the most recent of five-year period estimate data in
which the final year of the estimate ends in either zero or five. If the director of the
department of health and senior services is not a licensed physician, the department of health
and senior services may employ or contract with a licensed physician who may issue such a
statewide order with the express consent of the director.
3. Possession and use of epinephrine [auto-injector devices] delivery systems for
adult patients shall be limited as follows:
(1) No person shall use an epinephrine [auto-injector device] delivery system
pursuant to this section unless such person has successfully completed a training course in the
use of epinephrine [auto-injector devices] delivery systemsfor adult patients approved by the
director of the department of health and senior services. Nothing in this section shall prohibit
the use of an epinephrine [auto-injector device] delivery system:
(a) By a health care professional licensed or certified by this state who is acting
within the scope of his or her practice; or
(b) By a person acting pursuant to a lawful prescription;
(2) Every person, firm, organization and entity authorized to possess and use
epinephrine [auto-injector devices] delivery systems for adult patients pursuant to this
section shall use, maintain and dispose of such [devices] systems for adult patients in
accordance with the rules of the department; and

HCS HBs 1826, 2560, 2349 & 2194 8
(3) Every use of an epinephrine [auto-injector device] delivery system pursuant to
this section shall immediately be reported to the emergency health care provider as defined in
section 190.246.
4. (1) Use of an epinephrine [auto-injector device] delivery system pursuant to this
section shall be considered first aid or emergency treatment for the purpose of any law
relating to liability.
(2) Purchase, acquisition, possession or use of an epinephrine [auto-injector device]
delivery systempursuant to this section shall not constitute the unlawful practice of medicine
or the unlawful practice of a profession.
(3) Any person otherwise authorized to sell or provide an epinephrine [auto-injector
device] delivery system may sell or provide it to a person authorized to possess it pursuant to
this section.
5. (1) There is hereby created in the state treasury the "Epinephrine [Auto-injector
Devices] Delivery Systemsfor Fire Personnel Fund", which shall consist of [money collected
under this section] moneys appropriated to the fund. The state treasurer shall be custodian
of the fund. In accordance with sections 30.170 and 30.180, the state treasurer may approve
disbursements. The moneys in the fund as set forth in this section shall be subject to
appropriation by the general assembly for the particular purpose for which collected. The
fund shall be a dedicated fund and money in the fund shall be used solely by the department
of health and senior services for the purposes of providing epinephrine [auto-injector devices]
delivery systems for adult patients to qualified first responder agencies as used in this
section.
(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 33.080 to the contrary, any moneys
remaining in the fund at the end of the biennium shall not revert to the credit of the general
revenue fund.
(3) The state treasurer shall invest moneys in the fund in the same manner as other
funds are invested. Any interest and moneys earned on such investments shall be credited to
the fund.
✔